Vermont, session 2025-2026, S299.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. NOTICES; POSTING
(a)(1) An owner, or a person having the exclusive right to take game upon
land or the waters thereon, who desires to protect his or her the owner’s land or
private pond or propagation farm over which he or she the owner has exclusive
control may maintain notices stating that:
VT LEG #385867 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.299
2026 Page 2 of 3
(A) the shooting, trapping, or taking of game or wild animals is
prohibited or is by permission only;
(B) fishing or the taking of fish is prohibited or is by permission
only; or
(C) fishing, hunting, trapping, or taking of game is prohibited or is by
permission only.
(2) “Permission only signs” authorized under this section shall contain
the owner’s name and a method by which to contact the property owner or a
person authorized to provide permission to hunt, fish, or trap on the property.
(b) Notices prohibiting the taking of game shall be erected upon or near the
boundaries of lands to be affected with notices at each corner and not over 400
feet apart along the boundaries thereof. Legible signs must be maintained at
all times and shall be dated each year every five years or after a change in land
ownership. These signs shall be of a standard size and design as the
Commissioner shall specify.
(c) The owner or person posting the lands shall record this posting annually
every five years in the town clerk’s office of the town in which the land is
located. The posting shall be valid and enforceable for five years after the date
the posting is recorded. The recording form shall be furnished by the
Commissioner and shall be filled out in triplicate, one copy to be retained by
the town clerk, one copy to the Commissioner, and one copy to be retained by
VT LEG #385867 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.299
2026 Page 3 of 3
the person having the right to post the lands. The forms shall contain the
information as to the approximate number of acres posted, location in town,
date of posting, and signature of person so posting the lands. The town clerk
shall file the record, and it shall be open to public inspection. The town clerk
shall retain a fee of $5.00 for this recording.
(d) Land posted as provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be
enclosed land for the purposes herein.
Sec. 2. 27 V.S.A. § 618 is added to read:
§ 618. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION; POSTING OF LAND
(a) Disclosure of posted property. Prior to or as part of a contract for the
conveyance of real property, the seller shall notify the buyer whether the
property is posted pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 5201.
(b) Marketability of title. Noncompliance with the requirements of this
section shall not affect the marketability of title of a property.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385867 v.2